District of Columbia statutes.
2-1708

Copies, printouts, and photographs of public records.

Whenever a person has the right to inspect any public record subject to the requirements of this chapter, the person shall be furnished a copy, printout, or photograph of the record for a reasonable fee.

Sept. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-19, § 9, 32 DCR 3590
1981 Ed., § 1-2908.